Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1702
Definitions, sections found.

For purposes of the Commodity Code, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 8-1703 to 8-1716 shall be used.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 2.